Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-702
Incestuous marriages; declared void.

Incestuous marriages are marriages between parents and children, grandparents and grandchildren of every degree, between brothers and sisters of the half as well as the whole blood, and between uncles and nieces, aunts and nephews. Incestuous marriages are declared to be absolutely void. This section shall extend to children and relations born out of wedlock.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 141.